Hawaii statutes.
[§663-24 Effect on insurance.] No
advance payment made by an insurance company on behalf of an insured shall
increase the limits of liability of the insurance company under any existing
policy of insurance, and the amount of any advance payment made in respect to
any claim shall be credited against any obligation of the insurance company in
respect to said claim. [L 1969, c 233, §4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next